New York, session 2025-2026, A36.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1399-dd-1 of the public health law, as added by 2 section 13 of part EE of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 § 1399-dd-1. Public display of tobacco product and electronic ciga- 5 rette advertisements and smoking paraphernalia prohibited. 1. For 6 purposes of this section: 7 (a) "Advertisement" means words, pictures, photographs, symbols, 8 graphics or visual images of any kind, or any combination thereof, which 9 bear a health warning required by federal statute, the purpose or effect 10 of which is to identify a brand of a tobacco product, electronic ciga- 11 rette, or vapor product intended or reasonably expected to be used with 12 or for the consumption of nicotine, a trademark of a tobacco product, 13 electronic cigarette, or vapor product intended or reasonably expected 14 to be used with or for the consumption of nicotine [or], a trade name 15 associated exclusively with a tobacco product, electronic cigarette, or 16 vapor product intended or reasonably expected to be used with or for the 17 consumption of nicotine or to promote the use or sale of a tobacco prod- 18 uct, electronic cigarette, or vapor product intended or reasonably 19 expected to be used with or for the consumption of nicotine, or words, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00447-01-5 A. 36 2 1 pictures, photographs, symbols, graphics or visual images of any kind, 2 or any combination thereof which are associated with cannabis use or 3 cannabis products as defined in section three of the cannabis law and 4 which are intended or reasonably expected to promote the sale of such 5 products. 6 (b) "Smoking paraphernalia" means any pipe, water pipe, hookah, roll- 7 ing papers, electronic cigarette, vaporizer or any other device, equip- 8 ment or apparatus designed for the inhalation of tobacco or nicotine. 9 (c) "Vapor product" means any vapor product, as defined by section 10 thirteen hundred ninety-nine-aa of this article, intended or reasonably 11 expected to be used with or for the consumption of nicotine. 12 (d) "Tobacco products" shall have the same meaning as in subdivision 13 five of section thirteen hundred ninety-nine-aa of this article. 14 (e) "Electronic cigarette" shall have the same meaning as in subdivi- 15 sion thirteen of section thirteen hundred ninety-nine-aa of this arti- 16 cle. 17 2. (a) No person, corporation, partnership, sole proprietor, limited 18 partnership, association or any other business entity may place, cause 19 to be placed, maintain or to cause to be maintained, smoking parapher- 20 nalia or advertisements for any tobacco product, electronic cigarette, 21 or vapor product intended or reasonably expected to be used with or for 22 the consumption of nicotine [advertisements] in a store front or exteri- 23 or window or any door which is used for entry or egress by the public to 24 the building or structure containing a place of business within one 25 thousand five hundred feet of a school, provided that within New York 26 city such prohibitions shall only apply within five hundred feet of a 27 school. 28 (b) Any person, corporation, partnership, sole proprietor, limited 29 partnership, association or any other business entity in violation of 30 this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five 31 [hundred] thousand dollars for a first violation and not more than [one] 32 ten thousand dollars for a second or subsequent violation. 33 3. An enforcement officer, or the department where no enforcement 34 officer has been designated, shall conduct random inspections on a quar- 35 terly basis of each retail dealer licensed to sell cigarettes, tobacco 36 products, or vapor products at establishments located within the juris- 37 diction of such enforcement officer or office, to determine compliance 38 with the provisions of this section. 39 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 40 have become a law.